Hawaii statutes.
§454F-6 Pre-licensing and re-licensing;
education of mortgage loan originators. (a) An applicant for licensure as
a mortgage loan originator shall complete at least twenty hours of
pre-licensing education approved in accordance with subsection (b) that
includes:

(1) Three hours of federal law and regulations and
three hours of the State's law and rules;

(2) Three hours of ethics, which shall include
instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and

(3) Two hours of training related to lending
standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

Upon completion of the pre-licensing education, an
individual has up to twelve months to submit an application for licensure as a
mortgage loan originator. An individual who submits an application after the
twelve months have expired will be required to repeat the pre-licensing
education requirements.

(b) Pre-licensing education courses shall be
reviewed and approved by NMLS based upon reasonable standards. Review and
approval of a pre-licensing education course shall include review and approval
of the course provider.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
use of any pre-licensing education course approved by NMLS that is provided by
the employer of the applicant, an entity that is affiliated with the applicant
by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or
entity.

(d) Pre-licensing education may be offered
either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by NMLS.

(e) The pre-licensing education requirements
approved by NMLS for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion
of pre-licensing education requirements in this State.

(f) A person previously licensed under this
chapter and applying to be licensed under this chapter shall prove to the
satisfaction of the commissioner that the person has completed all of the
continuing education requirements for the year in which the license was last
held. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §13; am L 2013, c 168, §§8,
20; am L 2016, c 122, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next